st.aff
FLAG long
SFX c0 écer éçassions/ écer # po:simp po:1pl
SFX c0 éger égeassions/ éger # po:simp po:1pl
SFX c0 er assiez/ [^cg]er # po:simp po:2pl
SFX c0 écer éçassiez/ écer # po:simp po:2pl
SFX c0 éger égeassiez/ éger # po:simp po:2pl
SFX c0 er assent/ [^cg]er # po:simp po:3pl
SFX c0 écer éçassent/ écer # po:simp po:3pl
SFX c0 éger égeassent/ éger # po:simp po:3pl
SFX c0 ébrer èbre/ ébrer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 écer èce/ écer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 écher èche/ écher # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 écrer ècre/ écrer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éder ède/ éder # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éger ège/ éger # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 égler ègle/ égler # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 égner ègne/ égner # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 égrer ègre/ égrer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éguer ègue/ éguer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éler èle/ éler # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 émer ème/ émer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éner ène/ éner # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éper èpe/ éper # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 équer èque/ équer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 érer ère/ érer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éser èse/ éser # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éter ète/ éter # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 étrer ètre/ étrer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 évrer èvre/ évrer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 éyer èye/ éyer # po:impe po:2sg
SFX c0 er ons/ [^cg]er # po:impe po:1pl
SFX c0 écer éçons/ écer # po:impe po:1pl
SFX c0 éger égeons/ éger # po:impe po:1pl
SFX c0 er ez/ er # po:impe po:2pl
