st.dic
abécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
abéquer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
abréger/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
accéder/c0p.  # po:v1___n___a
accélérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
accréter/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q__a
acérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
aciérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
adhérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i_n___a
adultérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
aérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
afférer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
affréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
agglomérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
agréger/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
aléser/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
aliéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
allécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
alléger/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
alléguer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
altérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
anhéler/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
appéter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
arpéger/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
arriérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
assécher/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q__a
asséner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
assiéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
avérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
baréter/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
barriérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it____a
béguer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
béquer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
blasphémer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
blatérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
bléser/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
bréler/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
budgéter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
camembérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
caréner/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
céder/c0p+  # po:v1_itn___a
célébrer/c0p+  # po:v1_it____a
chronométrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
cogérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
commérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
compéter/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
compléter/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
concaténer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
concéder/c0p+  # po:v1__t____a
concélébrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
concréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
confédérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
conférer/c0p+  # po:v1_itn___a
conglomérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
considérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
coopérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i_n___a
coposséder/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
corréler/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
crécher/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
crémer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
créner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
déblatérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
décéder/c0p+  # po:v1_i____e_
décélérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
décérébrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
décher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
décolérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
décompléter/c0p+  # po:v1_it____a
déconsidérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
décorréler/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
décréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
déféquer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
déférer/c0p+  # po:v1__tn___a
dégénérer/c0p+  # po:v1_i_____a
dégréner/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
déléguer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
délibérer/c0p.  # po:v1_it____a
déposséder/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
dépoussiérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
déprotéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
dérégler/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
désaciérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
désaérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
désagglomérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q__a
désagréger/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
désaliéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
désaltérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
désespérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
déshydrogéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
déshypothéquer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
désincarcérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
désinsérer/c0p+  # po:v1_itxq__a
désintégrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
désoxygéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
dessécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
diéser/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
différer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
digérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
dilacérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
disséquer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
ébrécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
écher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
écrémer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
émécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
emmétrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
empéguer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
empiéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
empiéter/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
empoussiérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
enfiévrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
enflécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
enstérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
enténébrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
énumérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
espérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it____a
éviscérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
exagérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
exaspérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q__a
excéder/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
excréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
exécrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
exhéréder/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
exonérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
exulcérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
faséyer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
faubérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
fédérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
flécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
foéner/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
fréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
galérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
gangréner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
générer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
gérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it____a
gléner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
gréser/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
guilleméter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
hébéter/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
héler/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
hydrogéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
hypothéquer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
impétrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
imprégner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
incarcérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
incinérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
indifférer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
inférer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
infogérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it____a
ingérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
inquiéter/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
insérer/c0p+  # po:v1_itxq__a
intégrer/c0p+  # po:v1_itnq__a
intercéder/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
interférer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
interpénétrer/c0p+  # po:v1____p_e_
interpréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
invétérer/c0p+  # po:v1____p_e_
itérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
kilométrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
lacérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
lécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
légiférer/c0p.  # po:v1_i_____a
léguer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
léser/c0p+  # po:v1__t____a
libérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
liéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
lisérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
macérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
manéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
maniérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
mécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
métrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t____a
misérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
modérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
morigéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
obérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
oblitérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
obséder/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
obtempérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i_n___a
opérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
oxygéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
paramétrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
pécher/c0p.  # po:v1_i_____a
pénétrer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
perpétrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
persévérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
pestiférer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
péter/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
piéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
piéter/c0p+  # po:v1_i__q_zz
pondérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
posséder/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
pourlécher/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
précéder/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
prédécéder/c0p+  # po:v1_i____e_
préférer/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
prérégler/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
procéder/c0p.  # po:v1_i_____a
proférer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
proliférer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
prospérer/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
protéger/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
ralléger/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
rapiécer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
rasséréner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
réaléser/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
recéder/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
recéler/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
recéper/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
recompléter/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
reconsidérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
récupérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
référer/c0p+  # po:v1__tnq__a
refléter/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
refréner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
réfréner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
réfrigérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
régénérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
régler/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q__a
régner/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
réincarcérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
réinsérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
réintégrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
réinterpréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
réitérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
relégiférer/c0p+  # po:v1_i_____a
reléguer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
rempiéter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
rémunérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
rengréner/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
réopérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
réoxygéner/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
reparamétrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q__a
repérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
répéter/c0p+  # po:v1_it_q_zz
réséquer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
retransférer/c0p+  # po:v1__t____a
rétrocéder/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
réverbérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t_q_zz
rouspéter/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
secréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
ségréger/c0p+  # po:v1__t____a
sidérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
sphacéler/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
subdéléguer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
suggérer/c0p+  # po:v1_itn___a
surinterpréter/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
télémétrer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
téter/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
transférer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
transverbérer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
trompéter/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
végéter/c0p.  # po:v1_i____zz
vitupérer/c0p+  # po:v1_it___zz
zébrer/c0p+  # po:v1__t___zz
